Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1079.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6911. Unlawful change of consumer electric or natural gas supplier.(a) Offense.--A person commits an offense if the person knowingly changes a consumer's electric or natural gas supplier without the consumer's consent as required under 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2206(b) (relating to c onsumer protections and customer service ) or 2807(d)(1) (relating d uties of electric distribution companies ). (b) Grading.--(1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), an offense under subsection (a) shall be graded as follows:123456789101112131415161718 (i) A first offense shall be a misdemeanor of the first degree.(ii) A second or subsequent offense shall be a felony of the third degree.(2) When a person commits an offense under subsection (a) and there are multiple victims, the grading shall be one grade higher than specified in paragraph (1).(3) When a person commits an offense under subsection (a) and the victim of the offense is 60 years of age or older or a care-dependent person as defined in section 2713 (relating to neglect of care-dependent person), the grading of the offense shall be one grade higher than specified in paragraph (1).(c) Concurrent Jurisdiction.--(1) A district attorney for the county where either the victim resides or where the person initiated the contact shall have the authority to investigate and to institute criminal proceedings for a violation of this section.(2) In addition to the authority conferred upon the Attorney General by the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, the Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and to institute criminal proceedings for a violation of this section or a series of violations of this section involving more than one county of this Commonwealth or involving a county of this Commonwealth and another state. No person charged with a violation of this section by the Attorney General shall have standing to challenge the authority of the Attorney General to investigate or prosecute the case, and, if any such challenge is made, the challenge shall be 20250HB1079PN1197 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dismissed, and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the person making the challenge.(3) An administrative proceeding held before the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission or other agency shall not preclude prosecution under this section.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, "person" includes an electric or natural gas distribution company, electricity or natural gas supplier, marketer, aggregator, broker as defined in 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2202 (relating to definitions) and 2803 (relating to definitions), including any of their agents or employees.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1079PN1197 - 3 - 1234567891011